Utah statutes.
16-10a-1301.   Definitions.

For purposes of Part 13:

(1)  "Beneficial shareholder" means the person who is a beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee as the record shareholder.

(2)  "Corporation" means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter before the corporate action, or the surviving or acquiring corporation by merger or share exchange of that issuer.

(3)  "Dissenter" means a shareholder who is entitled to dissent from corporate action under Section 16-10a-1302 and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by Sections 16-10a-1320 through 16-10a-1328.

(4)  "Fair value" with respect to a dissenter's shares, means the value of the shares immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action.

(5)  "Interest" means interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the statutory rate set forth in Section 15-1-1, compounded annually.

(6)  "Record shareholder" means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee to the extent the beneficial owner is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder as provided in Section 16-10a-723.

(7)  "Shareholder" means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

